Utah statutes.
62A-5-311.   Temporary emergency commitment -- Observation and evaluation.

(1)  The director of the division or his designee may temporarily commit an individual to the division and therefore, as a matter of course, to an intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability for observation and evaluation upon:

(a)  written application by a responsible person who has reason to know that the individual is in need of commitment, stating:

(i)  a belief that the individual has an intellectual disability and is likely to cause serious injury to self or others if not immediately committed;

(ii)  personal knowledge of the individual's condition; and

(iii)  the circumstances supporting that belief; or

(b)  certification by a licensed physician or designated intellectual disability professional stating that the physician or designated intellectual disability professional:

(i)  has examined the individual within a three-day period immediately preceding the certification; and

(ii)  is of the opinion that the individual has an intellectual disability, and that because of the individual's intellectual disability is likely to injure self or others if not immediately committed.

(2)  If the individual in need of commitment is not placed in the custody of the director or the director's designee by the person submitting the application, the director's or the director's designee may certify, either in writing or orally that the individual is in need of immediate commitment to prevent injury to self or others.

(3)  Upon receipt of the application required by Subsection (1)(a) and the certifications required by Subsections (1)(b) and (2), a peace officer may take the individual named in the application and certificates into custody, and may transport the individual to a designated intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability.

(4) (a)  An individual committed under this section may be held for a maximum of 24 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.  At the expiration of that time, the individual shall be released unless proceedings for involuntary commitment have been commenced under Section 62A-5-312.

(b)  After proceedings for involuntary commitment have been commenced the individual shall be released unless an order of detention is issued in accordance with Section 62A-5-312.

(5)  If an individual is committed to the division under this section on the application of any person other than the individual's legal guardian, spouse, parent, or next of kin, the director or his designee shall immediately give notice of the commitment to the individual's legal guardian, spouse, parent, or next of kin, if known.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

